Illinois, session 104th, HB3741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 2.26 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.26)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.26)7    Sec. 2.26. Deer hunting permits. Any person attempting to 8take deer shall first obtain a "Deer Hunting Permit" issued by 9the Department in accordance with its administrative rules. 10Those rules must provide for the issuance of the following 11types of resident deer archery permits: (i) a combination 12permit, consisting of one either-sex permit and one 13antlerless-only permit, (ii) a single antlerless-only permit, 14and (iii) a single either-sex permit. The fee for a Deer 15Hunting Permit to take deer with either bow and arrow or gun 16shall not exceed $25 for residents of the State. The 17Department may by administrative rule provide for non-resident 18deer hunting permits for which the fee will not exceed $300 in 192005, $350 in 2006, and $400 in 2007 and thereafter except as 20provided below for non-resident landowners and non-resident 21archery hunters. The Department may by administrative rule 22provide for a non-resident archery deer permit consisting of 23not more than 2 harvest tags at a total cost not to exceed $325   HB3741- 2 -LRB104 10523 BDA 20598 b1in 2005, $375 in 2006, and $425 in 2007 and thereafter. The 2fees for a youth resident and non-resident archery deer permit 3shall be the same. 4    The Department shall create a pilot program during the 5special 3-day, youth-only deer hunting season to allow for 6youth deer hunting permits that are valid statewide, excluding 7those counties or portions of counties closed to firearm deer 8hunting. The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 9pilot program. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 10prohibit the Department from issuing Special Hunt Area Permits 11for the youth-only deer hunting season or establishing, 12through administrative rule, additional requirements 13pertaining to the youth-only deer hunting season on 14Department-owned or Department-managed sites, including 15site-specific quotas or drawings. The provisions of this 16paragraph are inoperative on and after January 1, 2023.17    The standards and specifications for use of guns and bow 18and arrow for deer hunting shall be established by 19administrative rule.20    No person may have in his or her possession any firearm not 21authorized by administrative rule for a specific hunting 22season when taking deer unless in accordance with the Firearm 23Concealed Carry Act.24    Persons having a firearm deer hunting permit shall be 25permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour 26before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those   HB3741- 3 -LRB104 10523 BDA 20598 b1days for which an open season is established for the taking of 2deer by use of shotgun, handgun, rifle, or muzzle loading 3rifle.4    Persons having an archery deer hunting permit shall be 5permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour 6before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those 7days for which an open season is established for the taking of 8deer by use of bow and arrow.9    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer by use of 10dogs, horses, automobiles, aircraft, or other vehicles, or by 11the use or aid of bait or baiting of any kind. For the purposes 12of this Section, "bait" means any material, whether liquid or 13solid, including food, salt, minerals, and other products, 14except pure water, that can be ingested, placed, or scattered 15in such a manner as to attract or lure white-tailed deer. 16"Baiting" means the placement or scattering of bait to attract 17deer. An area is considered as baited during the presence of 18and for 10 consecutive days following the removal of bait. 19Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the use of a dog to 20track wounded deer. Any person using a dog for tracking 21wounded deer must maintain physical control of the dog at all 22times by means of a maximum 50-foot 50 foot lead attached to 23the dog's collar or harness. Tracking wounded deer is 24permissible at night, but at no time outside of legal deer 25hunting hours or seasons shall any person handling or 26accompanying a dog being used for tracking wounded deer be in   HB3741- 4 -LRB104 10523 BDA 20598 b1possession of any firearm or archery device. Persons tracking 2wounded deer with a dog during the firearm deer seasons shall 3wear blaze orange or solid blaze pink color as required. Dog 4handlers tracking wounded deer with a dog are exempt from 5hunting license and deer permit requirements so long as they 6are accompanied by the licensed deer hunter who wounded the 7deer.8    It shall be unlawful to possess or transport any wild deer 9which has been injured or killed in any manner upon a public 10highway or public right-of-way of this State unless exempted 11by administrative rule.12    Persons hunting deer must have the gun unloaded and no bow 13and arrow device shall be carried with the arrow in the nocked 14position during hours when deer hunting is unlawful.15    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 16legal limit of deer by gun, to further participate with a gun 17in any deer hunting party.18    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 19legal limit of deer by bow and arrow, to further participate 20with bow and arrow in any deer hunting party.21    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 22contrary, a person who obtains a Deer Hunting Permit or set of 23permits or tags under this Section, that, in sum, is for the 24harvesting of 2 or more deer by that person, shall be required 25to harvest at least one antlerless deer out of the 2 or more 26deer harvested, if any deer are harvested. If a person who   HB3741- 5 -LRB104 10523 BDA 20598 b1obtains a Deer Hunting Permit or set of permits or tags under 2this Section, that, in sum, is for the harvesting of 2 or more 3deer by that person, knowingly harvests a deer but no 4antlerless deer, then that person shall be in violation of 5this Section. 6    The Department may prohibit upland game hunting during the 7gun deer season by administrative rule.8    The Department shall not limit the number of non-resident, 9either-sex archery deer hunting permits to less than 20,000. 10    Any person who violates any of the provisions of this 11Section, including administrative rules, shall be guilty of a 12Class B misdemeanor.13    For the purposes of calculating acreage under this 14Section, the Department shall, after determining the total 15acreage of the applicable tract or tracts of land, round 16remaining fractional portions of an acre greater than or equal 17to half of an acre up to the next whole acre. 18    For the purposes of taking white-tailed deer, nothing in 19this Section shall be construed to prevent the manipulation, 20including mowing or cutting, of standing crops as a normal 21agricultural or soil stabilization practice, food plots, or 22normal agricultural practices, including planting, harvesting, 23and maintenance such as cultivating or the use of products 24designed for scent only and not capable of ingestion, solid or 25liquid, placed or scattered, in such a manner as to attract or 26lure deer. Such manipulation for the purpose of taking   HB3741- 6 -LRB104 10523 BDA 20598 b1white-tailed deer may be further modified by administrative 2rule. 3(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-444, eff. 6-1-20; 4102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-932, eff. 1-1-23; revised 10-23-24.)